Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1383
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement the Cremation of Human Remains Act, to include, but not be limited to, rules and regulations establishing conditions under which human remains of persons whose death was caused by a disease declared by the department to be infectious, contagious, communicable, or dangerous to the public health may be transported in this state to a crematory for the purpose of cremation, and minimum sanitation standards for all crematories.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 29.